Utah statutes.
20A-14-103.   State Board of Education members -- When elected -- Qualifications -- Avoiding conflicts of interest.

(1) (a)  Unless otherwise provided by law, each State Board of Education member elected from a State Board of Education District at the 2010 general election shall:

(i)  serve out the term of office for which that member was elected; and

(ii)  represent the realigned district if the member resides in that district.

(b)  At the general election to be held in 2012, a State Board of Education member elected from State Board of Education Districts 4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 12, 13, and 15 shall be elected to serve a term of office of four years.

(c)  In order to ensure that the terms of approximately half of the State Board of Education members expire every two years:

(i)  at the general election to be held in 2012, the State Board of Education member elected from State Board of Education District 1 shall be elected to serve a term of office of two years; and

(ii)  at the general election to be held in 2014, the State Board of Education member elected from State Board of Education District 1 shall be elected to serve a term of office of four years.

(2) (a)  A person seeking election to the State Board of Education shall have been a resident of the State Board of Education district in which the person is seeking election for at least one year as of the date of the election.

(b)  A person who has resided within the State Board of Education district, as the boundaries of the district exist on the date of the election, for one year immediately preceding the date of the election shall be considered to have met the requirements of this Subsection (2).

(3)  A State Board of Education member shall:

(a)  be and remain a registered voter in the State Board of Education district from which the member was elected or appointed; and

(b)  maintain the member's primary residence within the State Board of Education district from which the member was elected or appointed during the member's term of office.

(4)  A State Board of Education member may not, during the member's term of office, also serve as an employee of:

(a)  the State Board of Education;

(b)  the Utah State Office of Education; or

(c)  the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation.

